Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB289.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 16.175 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Department of Kentucky State Police, in cooperation with the Transportation
Cabinet, the Division of Emergency Management, and media providers[the
Kentucky Broadcasters Association, and the Kentucky Press Association], shall
operate a system to notify the public when a child has been abducted or identified
by law enforcement as missing, and the department determines that public
notification might aid in the recovery of the child. The system shall be known as the
Kentucky Amber alert system.
(2) The system shall utilize existing resources, including but not limited to electronic
highway signs, the emergency broadcast system, law enforcement communications
systems, and local, regional, and statewide media providers, as authorized and
under conditions permitted by the federal government.
(3) A[No] public alert using the system shall not be issued unless the department, in
consultation with the law enforcement agency in the jurisdiction where the child
was abducted or reported missing[in which the abduction of a minor occurred], has
determined:
(a) That the:
1. Child[minor] has [actually ]been abducted or that all available evidence
strongly indicates that the child[minor] has been abducted;
2. Disappearance of the child may not have been voluntary and the
physical safety of the child may be endangered; or
3. Child is committed to the Department of Juvenile Justice or in the
temporary custody of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, a
relative, or a nonrelative placement;
(b) That public notification is the most appropriate method of recovering the child
Page 1 of 2
BR171500.100 - 1715 - XXXX 3/16/2026 3:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1715
in a safe and efficient manner; and
(c) The geographic area in which the notification shall be made.
(4) If the department determines[it is determined by the department] that public
notification shall be initiated, the department shall notify and provide the public
and private agencies and organizations that[which] will issue[actually provide] the
notification[ and shall provide those organizations and agencies] with the
information that[which] the department deems necessary.
(5) All law enforcement agencies in the Commonwealth shall cooperate with the
department in the provision and dissemination of information regarding any
abducted or missing and endangered child[minor].
(6) A[No] law enforcement agency[,] other than the department[,] shall not activate the
notification system specified in this section without the authority of the department.
(7) The system shall be operated by all agencies of the Commonwealth within existing
budgetary appropriations.
Section 2. This Act may be cited as Wynter's Law.
Page 2 of 2
BR171500.100 - 1715 - XXXX 3/16/2026 3:30 PM Jacketed